Colorado, session 2026A, SB164.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-5-427.5 as
follows:
-2- SB26-164

25-5-427.5. Regulation of lawful THC beverages -
manufacture of lawful THC beverages - registration - permit -
labeling requirements - definitions - rules.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "APPROVED SOURCE" MEANS:
(I) CULTIVATED HEMP FROM A STATE THAT HAS AN APPROVED
UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE HEMP PROGRAM;
(II) A PRODUCT FROM A WHOLESALE FOOD MANUFACTURER, HEMP
PRODUCT MANUFACTURER, OR STORAGE FACILITY REGISTERED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-426;
(III) A SUBSTANCE THAT IS DESIGNATED BY THE UNITED STATES
FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION AS "GENERALLY RECOGNIZED AS SAFE"
OR"GRAS";
(IV) HEMP PRODUCTS OR INGREDIENTS FROM ANOTHER STATE
THAT INSPECTS OR REGULATES HEMP PRODUCTS UNDER A FOOD SAFETY
PROGRAM OR EQUIVALENT CRITERIA TO ENSURE SAFETY FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION; OR
(V) IF ANOTHER STATE DOES NOT INSPECT OR REGULATE HEMP
PRODUCTS OR INGREDIENTS, THE OUT-OF-STATE HEMP SOURCE CAN
DEMONSTRATE EQUIVALENCY BY:
(A) MAINTAINING AN ANNUAL 21 CFR 111 OR 117 CERTIFICATION
CONDUCTED BY A QUALIFIED AUDITOR;
(B) PROVIDING EVIDENCE OF THE CERTIFICATION REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (1)(a)(V)(A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE REGISTERED HEMP
FACILITY IN COLORADO; AND
(C) PROVIDING DOCUMENTATION TO THE PURCHASER THAT ALL
-3- SB26-164

SUPPLIED HEMP PRODUCTS OR INGREDIENTS HAVE PASSED TESTING
REQUIREMENTS FOR POTENCY, MICROBIALS, MYCOTOXINS, PESTICIDES,
HEAVY METALS, AND RESIDUAL SOLVENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
DEPARTMENT RULES.
(b) "FEDERAL CONFORMITY TRIGGER" MEANS THE EFFECTIVE DATE
OF ANY FEDERAL LAW THAT RESTRICTS OR PROHIBITS THE INTRODUCTION
OF A HEMP PRODUCT, INCLUDING A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE, INTO
INTERSTATE COMMERCE.
(c) "HEMP" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 25-5-427
(2)(b).
(d) "HEMP PRODUCT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
25-5-427 (2)(d).
(e) (I) "LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE" MEANS A NONALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGE PRODUCT FORMULATED FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION THAT IS
INFUSED WITH TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL (THC) DERIVED FROM A LEGAL
SOURCE OF HEMP IN COLORADO OR AN APPROVED SOURCE OF HEMP IN
ANOTHER STATE AND THAT CONTAINS NO MORE THAN TEN MILLIGRAMS OF
TOTAL TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL (THC) PER SERVING.
(II) "LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE" DOES NOT INCLUDE A BEVERAGE
PRODUCT THAT IS INFUSED WITH THC THAT IS DERIVED FROM:
(A) REGULATED MARIJUANA;
(B) A SEMI-SYNTHETIC CANNABINOID, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
44-10-209 (2)(b); OR
(C) A SYNTHETIC CANNABINOID, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
44-10-209 (2)(c).
(III) IN THE EVENT OF A FEDERAL CONFORMITY TRIGGER, "LAWFUL
THC BEVERAGE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(e)(I)
-4- SB26-164

AND (1)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION; EXCEPT THAT THE LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGE MUST BE:
(A) INFUSED WITH THC DERIVED FROM A LEGAL SOURCE OF HEMP
IN COLORADO;
(B) MANUFACTURED OR PRODUCED IN COLORADO;
(C) DISTRIBUTED, OFFERED FOR SALE, AND SOLD SOLELY AT
RETAIL STORES IN COLORADO THAT HAVE A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE
PERMIT ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-8-103; AND
(D) NOT OFFERED FOR SALE OR DELIVERY OUTSIDE OF THE STATE.
(f) "REGISTRANT" MEANS A PERSON THAT IS REGISTERED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-427 (5) FOR THE
MANUFACTURE OR PRODUCTION OF A HEMP PRODUCT.
(g) "REGULATED MARIJUANA" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 44-10-103 (54).
(h) "TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL" OR "THC" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 44-10-209 (2)(d).
(2) Manufacture of lawful THC beverages.
(a) A REGISTRANT MAY MANUFACTURE AND SELL LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES IF THE REGISTRANT:
(I) IS REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO MANUFACTURE HEMP
PRODUCTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-427 (5);
(II) USES AN APPROVED SOURCE OF HEMP TO MANUFACTURE THE
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES;
(III) COMPLIES WITH THE RULES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT
FOR THE MANUFACTURE, PRODUCTION, LABELING, AND TRANSPORTATION
OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES; AND
(IV) SELLS THE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
-5- SB26-164

SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) (I) A REGISTRANT THAT MANUFACTURES A LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGE MAY PRODUCE A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE IN EITHER A
SINGLE-SERVING CONTAINER, A MULTI-SERVING CONTAINER, OR BOTH.
(II) A SINGLE-SERVING LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE MUST:
(A) BE BOTTLED, CANNED, OR PLACED IN A CONTAINER OF NO LESS
THAN FIFTY MILLILITERS AND NO MORE THAN NINETEEN AND TWO-TENTHS
OUNCES;
(B) BE BOTTLED, CANNED, OR PLACED IN A CONTAINER THAT
UTILIZES A TRADITIONAL PULL TAB OR BOTTLE CAP, UNLESS THE PRODUCT
IS LESS THAN TWO FLUID OUNCES IN TOTAL;
(C) CONTAIN NO MORE THAN TEN MILLIGRAMS OF THC PER
CONTAINER AND NO MORE THAN ONE SERVING PER CONTAINER; AND
(D) BE SOLD IN A PACK OF TWENTY-FOUR CANS, BOTTLES, OR
CONTAINERS OR FEWER.
(III) A MULTI-SERVING LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE MUST:
(A) BE BOTTLED OR PLACED IN A CONTAINER OF NO LESS THAN
THREE HUNDRED SEVENTY MILLILITERS AND NO MORE THAN ONE AND
THREE-QUARTERS LITERS;
(B) BE BOTTLED OR PLACED IN A RESEALABLE CONTAINER THAT
USES A SCREW-TOP OR CORK-STYLE CAP; AND
(C) BE MEASURED IN ONE AND ONE-HALF OUNCE SERVINGS OR
LESS AND CONTAIN NO MORE THAN TEN MILLIGRAMS OF THC PER
SERVING.
(c) A REGISTRANT THAT MANUFACTURES A LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGE MUST COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE RULES RELATED TO THE
TESTING, LABELING, PACKAGING, AND CONCENTRATION REQUIREMENTS
-6- SB26-164

FOR HEMP PRODUCTS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SECTION 25-5-427 (3)(f) AND SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) Sale and distribution.
(a) (I) A REGISTRANT THAT MANUFACTURES A LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGE SHALL ONLY SELL THE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE TO A
WHOLESALER THAT IS LICENSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-407 AND
THAT HOLDS A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT GRANTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 44-8-103.
(II) A REGISTRANT THAT MANUFACTURES LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES AND SELLS THE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES TO A WHOLESALER
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION MAY USE OR
EMPLOY A RETAIL MARIJUANA TRANSPORTER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
44-10-103 (65), TO DELIVER AND TRANSPORT THE LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES TO THE WHOLESALER'S FACILITY.
(b) A REGISTRANT THAT MANUFACTURES LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES SHALL NOT SELL DIRECTLY TO A PERSON LICENSED PURSUANT
TO ARTICLE 3 OF TITLE 44 OR ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 44.
(c) A REGISTRANT THAT MANUFACTURES LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES SHALL NOT SELL LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES DIRECTLY TO A
CONSUMER.
(4) Labeling - packaging - testing.
(a) IN ADDITION TO ALL LABELING, PACKAGING, AND CONSUMER
NOTICE REQUIREMENTS FOR HEMP PRODUCTS ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-427, A REGISTRANT
THAT MANUFACTURES A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE SHALL ENSURE THAT
THE LABEL AND PACKAGING OF A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE CONTAIN THE
FOLLOWING:
-7- SB26-164

(I) A STATEMENT THAT THE PRODUCT IS NOT APPROVED BY THE
UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION;
(II) AN EXPIRATION DATE;
(III) THE TOTAL AMOUNT, IN MILLIGRAMS, OF ANY HEMP-DERIVED
INTOXICATING CANNABINOID PER SERVING AND THE NUMBER OF SERVINGS
PER CONTAINER;
(IV) THE TOTAL AMOUNT, IN MILLIGRAMS, OF ANY HEMP-DERIVED
INTOXICATING CANNABINOID IN THE ENTIRE CONTAINER OR PACKAGE; AND
(V) A NUTRITION FACTS PANEL.
(b) (I) THE LABEL, PACKAGING, ADVERTISEMENT, OR TRADE DRESS
OF A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE SHALL NOT INCLUDE IMAGES OR DESIGNS
THAT ARE INTENDED TO BE ATTRACTIVE TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER
TWENTY-ONE YEARS OLD.
(II) A LABEL, PACKAGE, ADVERTISEMENT, OR TRADE DRESS FOR A
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE IS CONSIDERED ATTRACTIVE TO INDIVIDUALS
UNDER TWENTY-ONE YEARS OLD IF:
(A) IT INCLUDES CARTOONS, DRAWINGS, OR DEPICTIONS OF
OBJECTS, PERSONS, ANIMALS, OR OTHER CREATURES THAT FEATURE
COMICALLY EXAGGERATED CHARACTERISTICS; ATTRIBUTE HUMAN
CHARACTERISTICS TO ANIMALS, PLANTS, OR OBJECTS; OR PORTRAY ANY
UNNATURAL OR EXTRA-HUMAN ABILITIES; OR
(B) IT IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO PRODUCTS COMMONLY
MARKETED TO OR USED BY INDIVIDUALS UNDER TWENTY-ONE OLD,
INCLUDING CANDY, SODA, JUICE BEVERAGES, COOKIES, CEREAL, OR OTHER
SIMILAR PRODUCTS.
(III) THE INCLUSION OR DESCRIPTION OF FLAVOR, INGREDIENTS, OR
OTHER PRODUCT CHARACTERISTICS IS NOT CONSIDERED TO BE ATTRACTIVE
-8- SB26-164

TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER TWENTY-ONE YEARS OLD FOR THE PURPOSES OF
THIS SUBSECTION (4)(b).
(c) (I) PRIOR TO THE SALE OR DISTRIBUTION OF A LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGE, A REGISTRANT THAT MANUFACTURES A LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGE SHALL HAVE THE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE TESTED PURSUANT
TO THE RULES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE TESTING OF HEMP
PRODUCTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP TESTING STANDARDS FOR
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES, INCLUDING TESTING STANDARDS THAT:
(A) VERIFY THC POTENCY REPRESENTATIONS AND HOMOGENEITY
TO ENSURE ACCURATE LABELING AND CANNABINOID PROFILE FOR THE
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE;
(B) ESTABLISH AN ACCEPTABLE VARIANCE FOR THC POTENCY
REPRESENTATIONS, WHICH VARIANCE MUST NOT BE MORE THAN TEN
PERCENT;
(C) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES TO ADDRESS ANY THC POTENCY
MISREPRESENTATIONS, INCLUDING CORRECTIVE ACTION, RELABELING, OR
PRODUCT RECALL; AND
(D) ENSURE THAT LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES ARE SUBJECT TO
TESTING, SAMPLING, AND QUALITY-CONTROL STANDARDS THAT ARE
SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO THE TESTING, SAMPLING, AND
QUALITY-CONTROL STANDARDS APPLICABLE TO OTHER HEMP PRODUCTS.
(5) Rules. ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY CREATED IN
SECTION 44-3-201, SHALL ADOPT RULES RELATED TO THE MANUFACTURE
AND SALE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES CONSISTENT WITH THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING:
-9- SB26-164

(a) THE MANUFACTURE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES BY A
REGISTRANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION;
(b) THE SALE AND DISTRIBUTION OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES BY
A REGISTRANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION;
(c) TESTING, LABELING, AND PACKAGING REQUIREMENTS FOR
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES CONSISTENT WITH THE TESTING AND LABELING
REQUIREMENTS FOR HEMP PRODUCTS DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 25-5-427 (3)(f) AND SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(d) THE SAFE AND EFFECTIVE REGULATION AND TESTING OF
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES MANUFACTURED BY A PERSON FROM ANOTHER
STATE USING AN APPROVED SOURCE OF HEMP.
(6) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PERMIT A REGISTRANT TO
MANUFACTURE OR SELL A BEVERAGE PRODUCT THAT IS INFUSED WITH
THC THAT IS A SYNTHETIC CANNABINOID, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
44-10-209 (2)(c), OR A SEMI-SYNTHETIC CANNABINOID, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 44-10-209 (2)(b).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-5-427, amend
(2)(d), (4)(c)(I)(A), (4)(d)(II)(A), (8)(f)(II)(C), (8)(f)(II)(D), (8)(g)(II)(C),
and (8)(g)(II)(D); and add (2)(e.5), (8)(f)(II)(E), and (8)(g)(II)(E) as
follows:
25-5-427. Classes of hemp-derived compounds and
cannabinoid - definitions - registration required - prohibitions - safe
harbor - rules.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(d) "Hemp product" means:
(I) A finished product that contains hemp and that:
-10- SB26-164

(I) (A) Is a cosmetic, a dietary supplement, a food, a food additive,
or an herb;
(II) (B) Is intended for human use or consumption;
(III) (C) Contains any part of the hemp plant, including naturally
occurring cannabinoids, compounds, concentrates, extracts, isolates, or
resins;
(IV) (D) Is produced from hemp;
(V) (E) Contains no more than one and three-fourths milligrams
of THC per serving; and
(VI) (F) Contains a ratio of cannabidiol to THC of greater than or
equal to fifteen to one; OR
(II) A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE.
(e.5) "LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 25-5-427.5 (1)(e).
(4) Classifications of hemp-derived compounds and
cannabinoids - rules.
(c) (I) A person shall not:
(A) Manufacture, produce, or distribute a potentially intoxicating
cannabinoid within Colorado, as an ingredient in a hemp product or as a
finished hemp product, unless the potentially intoxicating cannabinoid is
a safe harbor hemp product that is exported from Colorado OR IS A
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE MANUFACTURED OR SOLD IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 25-5-427.5; or
(d) (II) A person shall not:
(A) Manufacture, produce, or distribute an intoxicating
cannabinoid within Colorado, as an ingredient in a hemp product or as a
finished hemp product, unless the intoxicating cannabinoid is a safe
-11- SB26-164

harbor hemp product that is exported from Colorado OR IS A LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGE MANUFACTURED OR SOLD IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
25-5-427.5; or
(8) Offenses. It is unlawful to engage in or knowingly cause a
person to engage in any of the following acts:
(f) (II) This subsection (8)(f) does not apply to:
(C) Cosmetics; or
(D) A hemp product that the United States food and drug
administration has determined is generally recognized as safe under the
"Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act", 21 U.S.C. sec. 301 et seq.
FEDERAL ACT; OR
(E) A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE MANUFACTURED OR SOLD IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-427.5.
(g) (II) This subsection (8)(g) does not apply to:
(C) Cosmetics; or
(D) A hemp product that the United States food and drug
administration has determined is generally recognized as safe under the
"Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act", 21 U.S.C. sec. 301 et seq.
FEDERAL ACT; OR
(E) A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE MANUFACTURED OR SOLD IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-427.5.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 8 to title
44 as follows:
ARTICLE 8
Regulation of Lawful THC Beverages
44-8-101. Legislative declaration.
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE
-12- SB26-164

REGULATION AND SALE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES IS A MATTER OF
STATEWIDE CONCERN AND SHOULD BE UNIFORM THROUGHOUT THE STATE.
44-8-102. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 8, UNLESS CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ALCOHOL BEVERAGE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 44-3-103 (2).
(2) "DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT" MEANS
THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT CREATED IN
SECTION 24-1-119.
(3) "LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 25-5-427.5 (1)(e).
(4) "LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT" MEANS A PERMIT GRANTED
BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY THAT PERMITS A LICENSEE TO SELL
OR DISTRIBUTE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES.
(5) "LICENSEE" MEANS:
(a) AN ESTABLISHMENT LICENSED BY THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 3 OF THIS TITLE 44 THAT SELLS OR
DISTRIBUTES ALCOHOL BEVERAGES AND HAS A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE
PERMIT;
(b) A RETAIL MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND SALES BUSINESS
LICENSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-10-610 AND THAT HAS A
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT; OR
(c) A RETAIL MARIJUANA TRANSPORTER LICENSED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH 44-10-605 AND THAT HAS A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT.
(6) "REGULATED MARIJUANA" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 44-10-103 (54).
-13- SB26-164

(7) "RETAIL MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND SALES BUSINESS" HAS
THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 44-10-103 (60.5).
(8) "RETAIL MARIJUANA TRANSPORTER" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 44-10-103 (65).
(9) "STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY" OR "LIQUOR ENFORCEMENT
DIVISION" MEANS THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY CREATED IN SECTION
44-3-201.
(10) "TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL" OR "THC" HAS THE MEANING
SET FORTH IN 44-10-209 (2)(d).
44-8-103. Lawful THC beverage permit - application - fees.
(1) A LICENSEE MAY APPLY TO THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY
TO RECEIVE A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT, WHICH AUTHORIZES THE
LICENSEE TO SELL OR DISTRIBUTE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 8.
(2) (a) TO APPLY FOR A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT, A
LICENSEE MUST SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY AND PAY ANY APPLICATION OR PERMITTING FEE IN AN AMOUNT
DETERMINED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 44-3-501 (3)(a)(XXIV).
(b) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL NOT SET THE AMOUNT
OF THE APPLICATION OR PERMITTING FEE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2)(a)
OF THIS SECTION IN AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT REQUIRED
TO COVER THE DEPARTMENT'S DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS TO
ADMINISTER AND ENFORCE THIS ARTICLE 8.
(c) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL TRANSMIT ANY
APPLICATION AND PERMITTING FEES COLLECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBSECTION (2) TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE
-14- SB26-164

APPLICATION AND PERMITTING FEES TO THE LIQUOR ENFORCEMENT
DIVISION AND STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY CASH FUND CREATED IN
SECTION 44-6-101.
(3) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (3)(b) AND (3)(c) OF
THIS SECTION, A LICENSEE THAT OBTAINS A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE
PERMIT MAY SELL OR DISTRIBUTE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES IN THE
MANNER THAT THE LICENSEE IS AUTHORIZED TO SELL OR DISTRIBUTE
ALCOHOL BEVERAGES UNDER THE LICENSE GRANTED BY THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY IF THE LICENSEE COMPLIES WITH THIS ARTICLE 8
AND ANY RELEVANT RULES ADOPTED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 8.
(b) A LICENSEE THAT IS A RETAIL MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND
SALES BUSINESS AND THAT OBTAINS A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT
MAY SELL LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES IN THE MANNER THAT THE LICENSEE
IS AUTHORIZED TO SELL REGULATED MARIJUANA PRODUCTS UNDER THE
LICENSE GRANTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-10-610 IF THE LICENSEE
COMPLIES WITH THIS ARTICLE 8 AND ANY RELEVANT RULES ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 8 OR SECTION 44-10-610 (6).
(c) A LICENSEE THAT IS A RETAIL MARIJUANA TRANSPORTER THAT
OBTAINS A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT MAY TRANSPORT LAWFUL
THC BEVERAGES IN THE MANNER THAT THE LICENSEE IS AUTHORIZED TO
TRANSPORT AND DISTRIBUTE REGULATED MARIJUANA PRODUCTS UNDER
THE LICENSE GRANTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-10-605 IF THE LICENSEE
COMPLIES WITH THIS ARTICLE 8 AND ANY RELEVANT RULES ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 8 OR SECTION 44-10-605.
44-8-104. Sale of lawful THC beverages - requirements -
labeling - prohibitions.
-15- SB26-164

(1) (a) A LICENSEE WITH A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT MAY
SELL OR DISTRIBUTE A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE.
(b) A LICENSEE WITH A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT SHALL
ONLY OFFER A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE FOR SALE IF THE LICENSEE HAS
PURCHASED A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE FROM:
(I) A WHOLESALER THAT IS LICENSED PURSUANT TO SECTION
44-3-407 AND THAT HOLDS A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT ISSUED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-8-103; OR
(II) A LICENSEE WITH A MANUFACTURER'S LICENSE ISSUED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-402, A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT
ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-8-103, AND A WHOLESALER'S LICENSE
ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-407.
(2) (a) A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE MUST BE SOLD TO A CUSTOMER
IN A SEALED, PREPACKAGED CONTAINER FOR OFF-PREMISES CONSUMPTION
OR SERVED FOR ON-SITE CONSUMPTION IN COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(2)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) IF A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE IS SOLD TO A CUSTOMER FOR
ON-SITE CONSUMPTION, THE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE MUST:
(I) BE IN AN OPEN, PREPACKAGED CAN OR BOTTLE THAT CONTAINS
NO MORE THAN TEN MILLIGRAMS OF TOTAL THC PER SERVING; OR
(II) BE SERVED AS A NONALCOHOLIC MIXED DRINK FOR ON-SITE
CONSUMPTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH RULES ADOPTED BY THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-8-106.
(3) A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE OFFERED FOR SALE MUST COMPLY
WITH ALL APPLICABLE RULES RELATED TO THE TESTING, LABELING,
PACKAGING, AND CONCENTRATION REQUIREMENTS THAT HAVE BEEN
ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH ENVIRONMENT IN
-16- SB26-164

ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-427.5 (5).
(4) WHEN OFFERING A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE FOR SALE OR
DISTRIBUTION, A LICENSEE SHALL ENSURE THAT:
(a) ALL LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES SOLD BY THE LICENSEE ARE
CLEARLY LABELED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE RULES ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SECTION 25-5-427.5; AND
(b) A CUSTOMER IS NOTIFIED OF THE CANNABINOID CONTENT AND
CONCENTRATION OF THE BEVERAGE AT THE POINT OF SALE THROUGH
PRODUCT LABELING, SIGNAGE, MENUS, OR OTHER WRITTEN MATERIALS.
(5) (a) A LICENSEE SHALL NOT SERVE A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE
TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS UNDER TWENTY-ONE YEARS OLD. THE LICENSEE
AND THE LICENSEE'S EMPLOYEES SHALL VERIFY THAT AN INDIVIDUAL
MEETS THE AGE REQUIREMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-3-901
(1)(b) OR 44-10-610 (2)(l).
(b) A LICENSEE SHALL ENSURE THAT ALL EMPLOYEES INVOLVED IN
THE SALE OR SERVICE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES COMPLETE A
RESPONSIBLE VENDOR TRAINING PROGRAM OR AN EQUIVALENT
CANNABIS-FOCUSED TRAINING PROGRAM TO PROMOTE SAFE CONSUMPTION
OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES.
(6) A LICENSEE SHALL NOT:
(a) SELL A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
VISIBLY INTOXICATED;
(b) ALLOW A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE SOLD ON THE PREMISES FOR
ON-SITE CONSUMPTION TO BE REMOVED FROM THE LICENSED PREMISES;
(c) EXCEPT FOR A LICENSEE THAT IS A RETAIL MARIJUANA
HOSPITALITY AND SALES BUSINESS, PERMIT THE USE OF REGULATED
-17- SB26-164

MARIJUANA OR REGULATED MARIJUANA PRODUCTS THAT ARE NOT A
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE ON THE PREMISES;
(d) SELL A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
UNDER TWENTY-ONE YEARS OLD; OR
(e) MIX A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE AND AN ALCOHOL BEVERAGE
IN THE SAME CONTAINER.
(7) (a) A LICENSEE THAT HAS A RETAIL LIQUOR STORE LICENSE
MAY SELL LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES THAT CONTAIN A POTENCY AMOUNT
ABOVE THREE MILLIGRAMS OF THC PER SERVING BUT NOT MORE THAN
TEN MILLIGRAMS OF THC PER SERVING IN EITHER A SINGLE-SERVING
CONTAINER OR MULTI-SERVING CONTAINER.
(b) A LICENSEE THAT HAS A CONVENIENCE STORE LICENSE OR
GROCERY STORE LICENSE MAY ONLY SELL LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES THAT
CONTAIN A POTENCY AMOUNT OF THREE MILLIGRAMS OF THC OR LESS PER
SERVING IN A SINGLE-SERVING CONTAINER.
(8) EXCEPT FOR A LICENSEE THAT HAS A RETAIL LIQUOR STORE
LICENSE ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-409, A LICENSEE SHALL NOT
SHIP OR DELIVER A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE DIRECTLY TO A CONSUMER.
(9) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PERMITS A LICENSEE TO SELL OR
SERVE A BEVERAGE PRODUCT THAT IS INFUSED WITH THC DERIVED FROM
A SEMI-SYNTHETIC CANNABINOID, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 44-10-209
(2)(b), OR A SYNTHETIC CANNABINOID, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 44-10-209
(2)(c).
44-8-105. Rules for transportation, inventory, and recall of
lawful THC beverages - seizure of products.
(1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
-18- SB26-164

AND ENVIRONMENT, SHALL ADOPT RULES RELATED TO THE
TRANSPORTATION, INVENTORY, AND RECALL OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES.
THESE RULES MUST INCLUDE:
(a) WHOLESALER REQUIREMENTS CONSISTENT WITH ARTICLES 3
AND 10 OF THIS TITLE 44 TO AUTHORIZE THE WHOLESALE OF LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES BY A PERSON THAT:
(I) HAS A WHOLESALER'S LICENSE ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION
44-3-407 AND A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT;
(II) IS A CRAFT BEVERAGE MANUFACTURER WITH WHOLESALE
PRIVILEGES AND A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT; OR
(III) HAS A RETAIL MARIJUANA TRANSPORTER'S LICENSE ISSUED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-10-605 AND A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT;
(b) RECALL, EMBARGO, AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS
CONSISTENT WITH ARTICLES 3 AND 10 OF THIS TITLE 44 TO ENSURE THAT
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES MAY BE RECALLED AND WITHDRAWN FROM THE
MARKET SAFELY AND EFFECTIVELY;
(c) RULES FOR THE TRANSPORTATION AND DELIVERY OF LAWFUL
THC BEVERAGES CONSISTENT WITH ARTICLES 3 AND 10 OF THIS TITLE 44,
INCLUDING PROVISIONS SPECIFIC TO THE TRANSPORTATION OF LAWFUL
THC BEVERAGES TO LICENSEES AND RETAIL MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND
SALES BUSINESSES; AND
(d) STORAGE, TRACKING, AND MONITORING OF LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES DURING THE PERIOD BETWEEN THE MANUFACTURE AND
RETAIL SALE OF THE BEVERAGES TO ENSURE THAT THE LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES ARE TRACEABLE AND MAINTAINED SAFELY.
(2) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY SEIZE, DESTROY, OR
CONFISCATE A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE THAT IS:
-19- SB26-164

(a) SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR DISPLAYED TO A CUSTOMER AT
A LOCATION THAT IS NOT PROPERLY LICENSED OR PERMITTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 8; OR
(b) OTHERWISE IN VIOLATION OF THIS ARTICLE 8 OR RULES
ADOPTED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY.
44-8-106. Powers and duties of the state licensing authority -
enforcement - rules.
(1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY SHALL ADOPT RULES NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT AND ENFORCE
THIS ARTICLE 8, INCLUDING RULES RELATED TO:
(a) THE ISSUANCE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMITS TO
LICENSEES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-8-103;
(b) THE SALE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES BY LICENSEES THAT
OBTAIN A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
44-8-104;
(c) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF SAFETY STANDARDS FOR THE
TRANSPORTATION, INVENTORY, AND RECALL OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-8-105;
(d) ALLOWING A LICENSEE TO USE OR SELL LARGE-CONTAINER
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES, SUCH AS SEVEN-HUNDRED-FIFTY-MILLILITER
BOTTLES, FOR SERVING LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE NONALCOHOLIC MIXED
DRINKS FOR ON-SITE CONSUMPTION;
(e) THE ISSUANCE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE LICENSE
ENDORSEMENTS TO A RETAIL MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND SALES
BUSINESS AND A RETAIL MARIJUANA TRANSPORTER SO THAT THE BUSINESS
MAY PURCHASE SELL, TRANSPORT, STORE, AND DISTRIBUTE LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES TO CONSUMERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 8;
-20- SB26-164

(f) THE WHOLESALE AND DISTRIBUTION OF LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES BY WHOLESALERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-8-105;
(g) THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS ARTICLE 8 CONSISTENT WITH THE
ENFORCEMENT OF ALCOHOL BEVERAGE VIOLATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PART 9 OF ARTICLE 3 OF THIS TITLE 44;
(h) THE SEIZURE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES BY THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-8-105;
(i) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF PENALTY STRUCTURES FOR VIOLATIONS
OF THIS ARTICLE 8 AND RULES ADOPTED BY THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 8;
(j) THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS ARTICLE 8, INCLUDING BY
CONDUCTING COMPLIANCE CHECKS AND ACCEPTING AND INVESTIGATING
CLAIMS FROM CUSTOMERS OR THIRD PARTIES RELATED TO THE SALE,
WHOLESALE, OR DISTRIBUTION OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES; AND
(k) OTHER RULES RELATED TO THE SALE, WHOLESALE, OR
DISTRIBUTION OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES, INCLUDING RULES RELATED
TO TRADE PRACTICE REQUIREMENTS, SALES BELOW COST, LOYALTY
PROGRAMS, LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE TASTINGS, PROMOTIONS, AND
ADVERTISING.
(2) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL NOT ADOPT ANY RULE
THAT PROHIBITS A LICENSEE FROM HOLDING A PARTIAL FINANCIAL
INTEREST IN A MANUFACTURER OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES REGISTERED
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS 25-5-427 AND 25-5-427.5.
(3) A LICENSEE THAT VIOLATES THIS ARTICLE 8 IS SUBJECT TO THE
SAME ADMINISTRATIVE, CIVIL, AND CRIMINAL PENALTIES APPLICABLE TO
ALCOHOL BEVERAGE VIOLATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH PART 9 OF
-21- SB26-164

ARTICLE 3 OF THIS TITLE 44.
44-8-107. Local regulation of lawful THC beverages.
(1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL NOT
ADOPT AN ORDINANCE, RESOLUTION, RULE, REGULATION, OR OTHER LAW
THAT:
(a) IMPOSES ADDITIONAL PRODUCT, LABELING, OR SERVICE
REQUIREMENTS BEYOND THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE 8, ANY
RULES ADOPTED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO THIS
ARTICLE 8, OR RULES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
AND ENVIRONMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-5-427 OR 25-5-427.5; OR
(b) CREATES MEANINGFUL DISTINCTIONS BETWEEN ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES AND LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES WHERE STATE LAW TREATS
BOTH ALCOHOL BEVERAGES AND LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES SIMILARLY.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY
PROHIBIT LICENSEES OPERATING IN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S
JURISDICTION FROM SELLING A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE THROUGH THE
ENACTMENT OF AN ORDINANCE OR THROUGH AN INITIATED OR REFERRED
MEASURE, WHICH INITIATED OR REFERRED MEASURE TO PROHIBIT THE
SALE OF LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES WITHIN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S
JURISDICTION MUST APPEAR ON A GENERAL ELECTION BALLOT DURING AN
EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A LOCAL GOVERNMENT
FROM ENACTING LAWS RELATED TO THE SALE OF LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES WITH RESPECT TO THE TIME, PLACE, OR MANNER IN WHICH THE
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES ARE SOLD.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-501, amend
(3)(a)(XXII) and (3)(a)(XXIII); and add (3)(a)(XXIV) as follows:
-22- SB26-164

44-3-501. State fees - rules.
(3) (a) The state licensing authority shall establish fees for
processing the following types of applications, notices, or reports required
to be submitted to the state licensing authority:
(XXII) Applications for each noncontiguous manufacturing
facility pursuant to section 44-3-402 and rules adopted pursuant to that
section; and
(XXIII) Applications for an alcohol beverage shipper license
pursuant to section 44-3-430 and rules adopted pursuant to that section;
AND
(XXIV) APPLICATIONS FOR A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-8-103 (2)(a).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-901, amend
(6)(q); and add (12) as follows:
44-3-901. Unlawful acts - exceptions - definitions.
(6) It is unlawful for any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant
to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44:
(q) (I) To knowingly permit the illegal sale, or negotiations for the
sale, of a controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), on the
licensee's licensed premises, EXCEPT FOR THE SALE OF LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-5-427.5 (1)(e), IN ACCORDANCE
WITH ARTICLE 8 OF THIS TITLE 44 AND ANY RULES ADOPTED BY THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 8 OF THIS TITLE 44.
(II) This subsection (6)(q) does not prohibit a pharmacy licensed
by the state board of pharmacy from selling lawfully prescribed controlled
substances at a liquor-licensed drugstore.
(12) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-8-106 (3), THE PROVISIONS
-23- SB26-164

OF THIS SECTION AND THE CORRESPONDING PROVISIONS IN SECTION
44-3-904 APPLY TO THE SALE AND CONSUMPTION OF LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-5-427.5 (1)(e).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-103, amend
(60.5) as follows:
44-10-103. Definitions - rules.
As used in this article 10, unless the context otherwise requires:
(60.5) (a) "Retail marijuana hospitality and sales business" means
a facility, which cannot be mobile, licensed to permit the consumption of
only the retail marijuana, or retail marijuana products, OR LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES it has sold pursuant to the provisions of an enacted, initiated,
or referred ordinance or resolution of the local jurisdiction in which the
licensee operates.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (60.5), "LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 25-5-427.5 (1)(e).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-605, add (6)
as follows:
44-10-605. Retail marijuana transporter license - lawful THC
beverage permit - definition - rules.
(6) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY, CREATED IN SECTION 44-10-201, SHALL ADOPT RULES THAT
PERMIT A RETAIL MARIJUANA TRANSPORTER LICENSEE TO OBTAIN A
LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-8-103 IN
ORDER TO SELL, STORE, TRANSPORT, AND DISTRIBUTE LAWFUL THC
BEVERAGES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-5-427.5 (1)(e), IN ACCORDANCE
WITH ARTICLE 8 OF THIS TITLE 44.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-10-610, add (6)
-24- SB26-164

as follows:
44-10-610. Retail marijuana hospitality and sales business
license - lawful THC permit - rules.
(6) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY, CREATED IN SECTION 44-10-201, SHALL ADOPT RULES THAT
PERMIT A RETAIL MARIJUANA HOSPITALITY AND SALES BUSINESS LICENSEE
TO OBTAIN A LAWFUL THC BEVERAGE PERMIT PURSUANT TO SECTION
44-8-103 IN ORDER TO SELL OR SERVE LAWFUL THC BEVERAGES, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 25-5-427.5 (1)(e), FOR ON-PREMISES CONSUMPTION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 8 OF THIS TITLE 44.
SECTION 9. Act subject to petition - effective date. Section
25-5-427.5 (1), (2), (3), (4), and (6), Colorado Revised Statutes, as
enacted in section 1 of this act; section 25-5-427, Colorado Revised
Statutes, as amended in section 2 of this act; sections 44-8-101, 44-8-102,
44-8-103, 44-8-104, 44-8-105 (2), 44-8-106 (2) and (3), and 44-8-107,
Colorado Revised Statutes, as enacted in section 3 of this act; section
44-3-501, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 4 of this act;
section 44-3-901, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 5 of
this act; and section 44-10-103, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended
in section 6 of this act, take effect January 1, 2028, and the remainder of
this act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of
the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly;
except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of
article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of
-25- SB26-164

the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor; except that
section 25-5-427.5 (1), (2), (3), (4), and (6), Colorado Revised Statutes,
as enacted in section 1 of this act; section 25-5-427, Colorado Revised
Statutes, as amended in section 2 of this act; sections 44-8-101, 44-8-102,
44-8-103, 44-8-104, 44-8-105 (2), 44-8-106 (2) and (3), and 44-8-107,
Colorado Revised Statutes, as enacted in section 3 of this act; section
44-3-501, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 4 of this act;
section 44-3-901, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 5 of
this act; and section 44-10-103, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended
in section 6 of this act, take effect January 1, 2028.
-26- SB26-164